North Carolina statutes. Chapter 130A. Public Health.
Article 9. Solid Waste Management.
§ 130A-309.58.
Disposal of scrap tires.

Each county is responsible for providing for the disposal of scrap tires located within its boundaries in accordance with the provisions of this Part and any rules issued pursuant to this Part. The following are permissible methods of scrap tire disposal:

Incinerating;

Retreading;

Constructing crash barriers;

Controlling soil erosion when whole tires are not used;

Chopping or shredding;

Grinding into crumbs for use in road asphalt, tire derived fuel, and as raw material for other products;

Slicing vertically, resulting in each scrap tire being divided into at least two pieces;

Sludge composting;

Using for agriculture-related purposes;

Chipping for use as an oyster cultch as approved by rules adopted by the Marine Fisheries Commission;

Cutting, stamping, or dyeing tires;

Pyrolizing and other physico-chemical processing;

Hauling to out-of-State collection or processing sites; and

Monofilling split, ground, chopped, sliced, or shredded scrap tires.

The Commission may adopt rules approving other permissible methods of scrap tire disposal. Landfilling of whole scrap tires is prohibited. The prohibition against landfilling whole tires applies to all whole pneumatic rubber coverings, but does not apply
to whole solid rubber coverings.

Units of local government may enter into joint ventures or other cooperative efforts with other units of local government for the purpose of disposing of scrap tires. Units of local government may enter into leases or other contractual arrangements with
units of local government or private entities in order to dispose of scrap tires.

Each county is responsible for developing a description of scrap tire disposal procedures. These procedures shall be included in the annual report required under

G.S. 130A-309.09

A. Further, any revisions to the initial description of the scrap tire disposal procedures shall be forwarded to the Department.

A county shall provide, directly or by contract with another unit of local government or private entity, at least one site for scrap tire disposal for that county. The unit of local government or contracting party may not charge a disposal fee for the
disposal of scrap tires except as provided in this subsection. A unit of local government or contracting party may charge a disposal fee that does not exceed the cost of disposing of the scrap tires only if:

The scrap tires are new tires that are being disposed of by their manufacturer because they do not meet the manufacturer’s standards for salable tires; or

The scrap tires are delivered to a local government scrap tire disposal site without an accompanying certificate required by G.S. 130A-309.58(f) that indicates that the tires originated in a county within North Carolina.

Every tire retailer or other person disposing of scrap tires shall complete and sign a certification form prescribed by the Department and distributed to each county, certifying that the tires were collected in the normal course of business for disposal,
the county in which the tires were collected, and the number of tires to be disposed of. This form also shall be completed and signed by the tire hauler, certifying that the load contains the same tires that were received from
the tire retailer or other person disposing of scrap tires. The tire hauler shall present this certification form to the tire processor or tire collector at the time of delivery of the scrap tires for disposal, collection, or processing.
Copies of these certification forms shall be retained for a minimum of three years after the date of delivery of the scrap tires.

The provisions of subsection (f) of this section do not apply to tires that are brought for disposal in quantities of five or less by someone other than a tire collector, tire processor, or tire hauler.

History.
1989, c. 784, s. 3; 1991, c. 221, s. 5; 1993, c. 548, s. 4; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 594, s. 22; 1997-209, s. 1; 2013-409, s. 4.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-409, s. 4, effective August 23, 2013, in subsection (d), rewrote the former second sentence, which read “These procedures shall be included in any solid waste management plan required by the Department under this Article.”

§ 130A-309.59.
Registration of tire haulers.

Before engaging in the hauling of scrap tires in this State, any tire hauler must register with the Department whereupon the Department shall issue to the tire hauler a scrap tire hauling identification number. A tire retailer licensed under

G.S. 105-164.29

and solely engaged in the hauling of scrap tires received by it in connection with the retail sale of replacement tires is not required to register under this section.

Each tire hauler shall furnish its hauling identification number on all certification forms required under G.S. 130A-309.58(f). Any tire retailer engaged in the hauling of scrap tires and not required by subsection (a) of this section to be registered
shall supply its merchant identification number on all certification forms required by G.S. 130A-309.58(f).

History.
1989, c. 784, s. 3.

§ 130A-309.60.
Nuisance tire collection sites.

On or after July 1, 1990, if the Department determines that a tire collection site is a nuisance, it shall notify the person responsible for the nuisance and request that the tires be processed or removed within 90 days. If the person fails to take the
requested action within 90 days, the Department shall order the person to abate the nuisance within 90 days. If the person responsible for the nuisance is not the owner of the property on which the tire collection site is located,
the Department may order the property owner to permit abatement of the nuisance. If the person responsible for the nuisance fails to comply with the order, the Department shall take any action necessary to abate the nuisance, including
entering the property where the tire collection site is located and confiscating the scrap tires, or arranging to have the scrap tires processed or removed.

When the Department abates the nuisance pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, the person responsible for the nuisance shall be liable for the actual costs incurred by the Department for its nuisance abatement activities and its administrative and
legal expenses related to the abatement. The Department may ask the Attorney General to initiate a civil action to recover these costs from the person responsible for the nuisance. Nonpayment of the actual costs incurred by the
Department shall result in the imposition of a lien on the owner’s real property on which the tire collection site is located.

This section does not apply to any of the following:

A retail business premises where tires are sold if no more than 500 scrap tires are kept on the premises at one time;

The premises of a tire retreading business if no more than 3,000 scrap tires are kept on the premises at one time;

A premises where tires are removed from motor vehicles in the ordinary course of business if no more than 500 scrap tires are kept on the premises at one time;

A solid waste disposal facility where no more than 60,000 scrap tires are stored above ground at one time if all tires received for storage are processed, buried, or removed from the facility within one year after receipt;

A site where no more than 250 scrap tires are stored for agricultural uses; and

A construction site where scrap tires are stored for use or used in road surfacing and construction of embankments.

The descending order of priority for the Department’s abatement activities under subsection (a) of this section is as follows:

Tire collection sites determined by the Department to contain more than 1,000,000 tires;

Tire collection sites which constitute a fire hazard or threat to public health;

Tire collection sites in densely populated areas; and

Any other tire collection sites that are determined to be a nuisance.

This section does not change the existing authority of the Department to enforce any existing laws or of any person to abate a nuisance.

As used in this section, “nuisance” means an unreasonable danger to public health, safety, or welfare or to the environment.

History.
1989, c. 784, s. 3.

§ 130A-309.61.
Effect on local ordinances.

This Part preempts any local ordinance regarding the disposal of scrap tires to the extent the local ordinance is inconsistent with this Part or the rules adopted pursuant to this Part.

History.
1989, c. 784, s. 3; 1993, c. 548, s. 5; 1997-209, s. 1.

§ 130A-309.62.
Fines and penalties.

Any person who knowingly hauls or disposes of a tire in violation of this Part or the rules adopted pursuant to this Part shall be assessed a civil penalty of fifty dollars ($50.00) per violation. Each tire hauled or disposed of in violation of this Part
or rules adopted pursuant to this Part constitutes a separate violation.

The clear proceeds of civil penalties assessed pursuant to this section shall be remitted to the Civil Penalty and Forfeiture Fund in accordance with

G.S. 115C-457.2

.

History.
1989, c. 784, s. 3; 1998-215, s. 55.

§ 130A-309.63.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2013-360, s. 14.16(b), effective July 1, 2013.

History.
1993, c. 548, s. 6; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 594, s. 23; 1997-209, ss. 1, 2; 2001-452, s. 3.4; 2002-126, s. 12.5(b); 2010-31, s. 13.1(d); repealed by 2013-360, s. 14.16(b), effective July 1, 2013.

§ 130A-309.64.
Scrap Tire Disposal Program; other Department activities related to scrap tires.

The Department may make grants to units of local government to assist them in disposing of scrap tires. To administer the grants, the Department shall establish procedures for applying for a grant and the criteria for selecting among grant applicants.
The criteria shall include the financial ability of a unit of local government to provide for scrap tire disposal, the severity of a unit of local government’s scrap tire disposal problem, the effort made by a unit of local government
to ensure that only tires generated in the normal course of business in this State are provided free disposal, and the effort made by a unit of local government to provide for scrap tire disposal within the resources available
to it.

A unit of local government is not eligible for a grant under subsection (a) of this section unless its costs for disposing of scrap tires for the six-month period preceding the date the unit of local government files an application for a grant exceeded
the amount the unit of local government received during that period from the proceeds of the scrap tire tax under

G.S. 105-187.19

. A grant to a unit of local government for scrap tire disposal may not exceed the unit of local government’s unreimbursed cost for the six-month period.

The Department may support a position to provide local governments with assistance in developing and implementing scrap tire management programs designed to complete the cleanup of nuisance tire collection sites and prevent scrap tires generated from
outside of the State from being presented for free disposal in the State.

The Department may clean up scrap tire collection sites that the Department has determined are a nuisance. The Department may use funds to clean up a nuisance tire collection site only if no other funds are available for that purpose.

The Department shall include in the report to be delivered to the Environmental Review Commission pursuant to G.S. 130A-309.06(c) a description of the implementation of the North Carolina Scrap Tire Disposal Act under this Part for the fiscal year ending
the preceding June 30. The description of the implementation of the North Carolina Scrap Tire Disposal Act shall include a list of the recipients of grants under subsection (a) of this section and the amount of each grant for the
previous 12-month period. The report also shall include the amount of funds used to clean up nuisance sites under subsection (d) of this section.

It is the intent of the General Assembly to allow the Department to satisfy grant obligations that extend beyond the end of the fiscal year.

The Department may adopt any rules necessary to implement this section.

History.
2013-360, s. 14.16(c); 2020-74, s. 11(d); 2020-78, s. 7.2(d).

§§ 130A-309.65 through 130A-309.69.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

Part 2C. Lead-Acid Batteries.

§ 130A-309.70.
Landfilling and incineration of lead-acid batteries prohibited; delivery for recycling.

No person shall knowingly place or dispose of a used lead-acid battery in a landfill, incinerator, or in any waste-to-energy facility. Any person may deliver a lead-acid battery to a battery retailer or wholesaler, or to a secondary lead smelter, or
to a collection or recycling facility authorized under this Chapter or by the United States Environmental Protection Agency.

No battery retailer shall knowingly place or dispose of a used lead-acid battery in a landfill, incinerator, or waste-to-energy facility. Any battery retailer may deliver a used lead-acid battery to the agent of a battery wholesaler or a secondary lead
smelter, to a battery manufacturer for delivery to a secondary lead smelter, or to a collection or recycling facility authorized under this Chapter or by the United States Environmental Protection Agency.

Any person who knowingly places or disposes of a lead-acid battery in violation of this section shall be assessed a civil penalty of not more than fifty dollars ($50.00) per violation. Each battery improperly disposed of shall constitute a separate violation.The
clear proceeds of civil penalties assessed pursuant to this section shall be remitted to the Civil Penalty and Forfeiture Fund in accordance with

G.S. 115C-457.2

.

History.
1991, c. 375, s. 2; 1998-215, s. 56.

§ 130A-309.71.
Retailers required to accept lead-acid batteries for recycling; posting of notice required.

A person who sells or offers for sale lead-acid batteries at retail in this State shall accept from customers, at the point of transfer or sale, used lead-acid batteries of the type and in a quantity at least equal to the number of new batteries purchased,
if offered by customers.

A person who sells or offers for sale lead-acid batteries at retail in this State shall post written notice which must be at least 81/2 inches by 11 inches in size and must contain the universal recycling symbol and the following language:

“It is illegal to improperly dispose of a motor vehicle battery or other lead-acid battery.”

“Recycle your used batteries.”

“State law requires us to accept used motor vehicle batteries or other lead-acid batteries for recycling in exchange for new batteries purchased.”

Any person who fails to post the notice required by subsection (b) of this section after receiving a written warning from the Department to do so shall be assessed a civil penalty of not more than fifty dollars ($50.00) per day for each day the person
fails to post the required notice.The clear proceeds of civil penalties assessed pursuant to this section shall be remitted to the Civil Penalty and Forfeiture Fund in accordance with

G.S. 115C-457.2

.

History.
1991, c. 375, s. 2; 1998-215, s. 57.

§ 130A-309.72.
Wholesalers required to accept lead-acid batteries.

No person selling new lead-acid batteries at wholesale shall refuse to accept from customers at the point of transfer, used lead-acid batteries of the type and in a quantity at least equal to the number of new batteries purchased, if offered by customers.
A person accepting batteries in transfer from a battery retailer shall be allowed a period not to exceed 90 days to remove batteries from the retail point of collection.

Any person who violates this section shall be assessed a civil penalty of fifty dollars ($50.00) per violation. Each battery refused by a wholesaler or not removed from the retail point of collection within 90 days shall constitute a separate violation.The
clear proceeds of civil penalties assessed pursuant to this section shall be remitted to the Civil Penalty and Forfeiture Fund in accordance with

G.S. 115C-457.2

.

History.
1991, c. 375, s. 2; 1998-215, s. 58.

§ 130A-309.73.
Inspections of battery retailers authorized; construction of this Part.

The Department may inspect any place, building, or premise subject to the provisions of

G.S. 130A-309.71

. The Department may issue warnings to persons who fail to comply with the provisions of this Part.

The provisions of this Part shall not be construed to prohibit any person who does not sell lead-acid batteries from collecting and recycling such batteries.

History.
1991, c. 375, s. 2.

§§ 130A-309.74 through 130A-309.79.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

Part 2D. Management of Discarded White Goods.

§ 130A-309.80.
Findings and purpose.

The General Assembly finds that white goods are difficult to dispose of, that white goods that contain chlorofluorocarbon refrigerants pose a danger to the environment, and that it is in the best interest of the State to require that chlorofluorocarbon
refrigerants be removed from discarded white goods. This Part therefore provides for the management of discarded white goods.

History.
1993, c. 471, s. 4.

§ 130A-309.81.
Management of discarded white goods; disposal fee prohibited.

Duty. — Each county is responsible for providing at least one site for the collection of discarded white goods. It must also provide for the disposal of discarded white goods and for the removal of chlorofluorocarbon refrigerants from white goods. A
county may contract with another unit of local government or a private entity in accordance with Article 15 of Chapter 153A of the General Statutes to provide for the management of discarded white goods or for the removal of chlorofluorocarbon
refrigerants from white goods.

Restrictions. — A unit of local government or a contracting party may not charge a disposal fee for the disposal of white goods. A white good may not be disposed of in a landfill, an incinerator, or a waste-to-energy facility.

Plan. — Each county shall establish written procedures for the management of white goods. These procedures shall be included in the annual report required under

G.S. 130A-309.09

A.

History.
1993, c. 471, ss. 4, 6; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 745, ss. 36, 37; 2001-265, s. 6; 2013-409, s. 5.

§ 130A-309.82.
Use of disposal tax proceeds by counties.

Article 5C of Chapter 105 of the General Statutes imposes a tax on new white goods to provide funds for the management of discarded white goods. A county must use the proceeds of the tax distributed to it under that Article for the management of discarded
white goods. The purposes for which a county may use the tax proceeds include, but are not limited to, the following:

Capital improvements for infrastructure to manage discarded white goods, such as concrete pads for loading, equipment essential for moving white goods, storage sheds for equipment essential to white goods disposal management, and freon extraction equipment.

Operating costs associated with managing discarded white goods, such as labor, transportation, and freon extraction.

The cleanup of illegal white goods disposal sites, the cleanup of illegal disposal sites consisting of more than fifty percent (50%) discarded white goods, and, as to those illegal disposal sites consisting of fifty percent (50%) or less discarded white
goods, the cleanup of the discarded white goods portion of the illegal disposal sites.

Except as provided in subdivision (3) of this section, a county may not use the tax proceeds for a capital improvement or operating expense that does not directly relate to the management of discarded white goods. Except as provided in subdivision (3)
of this section, if a capital improvement or operating expense is partially related to the management of discarded white goods, a county may use the tax proceeds to finance a percentage of the costs equal to the percentage
of the use of the improvement or expense directly related to the management of discarded white goods.

History.
1993, c. 471, s. 4; 1998-24, ss. 4, 7; 2000-109, s. 9(a); 2001-265, s. 5.

§ 130A-309.83.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2013-360, s. 14.17(e), effective June 30, 2017.

History.
1993, c. 471, s. 4; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 594, s. 24; 1998-24, s. 7; 2000-109, s. 9(a); 2001-265, s. 5; 2013-360, s. 14.17(b).

§ 130A-309.84.
Civil penalties for improper disposal.

The Department may assess a civil penalty of not more than one hundred dollars ($100.00) against a person who, knowing it is unlawful, places or otherwise disposes of a discarded white good in a landfill, an incinerator, or a waste-to-energy facility.
The Department may assess this penalty for the day the unlawful disposal occurs and each following day until the white good is disposed of properly.

The Department may assess a penalty of up to one hundred dollars ($100.00) against a person who, knowing it is required, fails to remove chlorofluorocarbon refrigerants from a discarded white good. The Department may assess this penalty for the day the
failure occurs and each following day until the chlorofluorocarbon refrigerants are removed.

The clear proceeds of civil penalties assessed pursuant to this section shall be remitted to the Civil Penalty and Forfeiture Fund in accordance with

G.S. 115C-457.2

.

History.
1993, c. 471, s. 4; 1998-215, s. 59.

§ 130A-309.85.
Reporting on the management of white goods.

The Department shall include in the report to be delivered to the Environmental Review Commission pursuant to G.S. 130A-309.06(c) a description of the management of white goods in the State for the fiscal year ending the preceding 30 June. The description
of the management of white goods shall include the following information:

The amount of taxes collected and distributed under

G.S. 105-187.24

during the period covered by the report.

The cost to each county of managing white goods during the period covered by the report.

Repealed by Session Laws 2013-360, s. 14.17(f), effective June 20, 2017.

Any other information the Department considers helpful in understanding the problem of managing white goods.

A summary of the information concerning the counties’ white goods management programs contained in the counties’ Annual Financial Information Report.

History.
1993, c. 471, s. 4; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 594, s. 25; 1998-24, ss. 5, 7; 2000-109, s. 9(a); 2001-265, s. 5; 2001-452, s. 3.5; 2013-360, s. 14.17(f); 2020-74, s. 11(e); 2020-78, s. 7.2(e).

§ 130A-309.86.
Effect on local ordinances.

This Part preempts any local ordinance regarding the management of white goods that is inconsistent with this Part or the rules adopted pursuant to this Part. It does not preempt any local ordinance regarding the management of white goods that is consistent
with this Part or rules adopted pursuant to this Part.

History.
1993, c. 471, s. 4.

§ 130A-309.87.
Eligibility for disposal tax proceeds.

Receipt of Funds. — A county may not receive a quarterly distribution of the white goods disposal tax proceeds under

G.S. 105-187.24

unless the undesignated balance in the county’s white goods account at the end of its fiscal year is less than the threshold amount. Based upon the information in a county’s Annual Financial Information Report, the
Department must notify the Department of Revenue by March 1 of each year which counties may not receive a distribution of the white goods disposal tax for the current calendar year. The Department of Revenue will credit the undistributed
tax proceeds to the General Fund.If the undesignated balance in a county’s white goods account subsequently falls below the threshold amount, the county may submit a statement to the Department, certified by the county finance
officer, that the undesignated balance in its white goods account is less than the threshold amount. Upon receipt of the statement, the Department will notify the Department of Revenue to distribute to the county its quarterly
distribution of the white goods disposal tax proceeds. The Department must notify the Department of Revenue of the county’s change of status at least 30 days prior to the next quarterly distribution.For the purposes of this subsection,
the term “threshold amount” means twenty-five percent (25%) of the amount of white goods disposal tax proceeds a county received, or would have received if it had been eligible to receive them under

G.S. 130A-309.87

, during the preceding fiscal year.

Annual Financial Information Report. — On or before November 1 of each year, a county must submit a copy of its Annual Financial Information Report, prepared in accordance with

G.S. 159-33.1

, to the Department. The Secretary of the Local Government Commission must require the following information in that report:

The tonnage of white goods scrap metal collected.

The amount of revenue credited to its white goods account. This revenue should include all receipts derived from the white goods disposal tax, and the sale of white goods scrap metals and freon.

The expenditures from its white goods account. The expenditures should include operating expenses and capital improvement costs associated with its white goods management program.

The designated and undesignated balance of its white goods account.

A comparison of the undesignated balance of its white goods account at the end of the fiscal year and the amount of white goods disposal tax proceeds it received, or would have received if it had been eligible to receive it under

G.S. 130A-309.87

, during the fiscal year.

History.
1998-24, s. 6; 2013-360, s. 14.17(c), (g).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-360, s. 14.17(c), effective August 1, 2013, substituted “General Fund” for “White Goods Management Account” at the end of subsection (a).

Session Laws 2013-360, s. 14.17(g), effective June 30, 2017, in subdivision (b)(2), inserted “and” following “disposal tax,” and deleted “and a grant from the White Goods Management Account” at the end.

§§ 130A-309.88,
130A-309.89.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

Part 2E. Discarded Computer Equipment and Television Management.

§§ 130A-309.90 through 130A-309.99.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2010-67, s. 1, effective July 1, 2010.

History.
S. 130A-309.90; 2007-550, s. 16.1(a); 2008-198, s. 11.4; 2008-208, ss. 1, 7; 2009-484, s. 16(a), (b); 2009-550, s. 10(a), (b); s. 130A-309.91; 2007-550, s. 16.1(a); 2008-198, ss. 11.3, 11.4; 2008-208, ss. 1, 7; 2009-484,
s. 16(a), (b); 2009-550, s. 10(a), (b); ss. 130A-309.92 — 130A-309.98; 2007-550, s. 16.1(a); 2008-198, s. 11.4; 2008-208, ss. 1, 7; 2009-484, s. 16(a), (b); 2009-550, s. 10(a), (b); s. 130A-309.99; 2008-208, s. 1; 2009-484, s. 16(b);
2009-550, s. 10(b); repealed by 2010-67, s. 1, effective July 1, 2010.

Cross References.

For current provisions as to discarded computer equipment and television management, see Part 2H (G.S. 130A-309.130 et seq.) of this article.

§§ 130A-309.100 through 130A-309.110.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

Part 2F. Management of Abandoned Manufactured Homes.

§ 130A-309.111.
(Expires October 1, 2023) Purpose.

The purpose of this Part is to provide units of local government with the authority, funding, and guidance needed to provide for the efficient and proper identification, deconstruction, recycling, and disposal of abandoned manufactured homes in this State.

History.
2008-136, s. 1.

§ 130A-309.112.
(Expires October 1, 2023) Definitions.

The following definitions apply to this Part:

“Abandoned manufactured home” means a manufactured home or mobile classroom that is both:

Vacant or in need of extensive repair.

An unreasonable danger to public health, safety, welfare, or the environment.

“Intact” when used in connection with “abandoned manufactured home” means an abandoned manufactured home from which the wheels and axles, white goods, and recyclable materials have not been removed.

“Manufactured home” is defined in

G.S. 105-164.3

.

“Responsible party” means any person or entity that possesses an ownership interest in an abandoned manufactured home.

History.
2008-136, s. 1.

§ 130A-309.113.
(Expires October 1, 2023) Management of abandoned manufactured homes.

Plan. — Each county shall consider whether to implement a program for the management of abandoned manufactured homes. If at any time the county decides to implement a program, the county shall develop a written plan for the management of abandoned manufactured
homes. This plan shall be included in the annual report required under

G.S. 130A-309.09

A. At a minimum, the plan shall include:

A method by which the county proposes to identify abandoned manufactured homes in the county, including, without limitation, a process by which manufactured home owners or other responsible parties may request designation of their home as an abandoned
manufactured home.

A plan for the deconstruction of these abandoned manufactured homes.

A plan for the removal of the deconstructed components, including mercury switches from thermostats, for reuse or recycling, as appropriate.

A plan for the proper disposal of abandoned manufactured homes that are not deconstructed under subdivision (2) of this subsection.

Authority to Contract. — A county may contract with another unit of local government or a private entity in accordance with Article 15 of Chapter 153A of the General Statutes to provide for the management of abandoned manufactured homes within the county
and the implementation of its plan under subsection (a) of this section.

Fee Authority. — A unit of local government or a party that contracted with the county under subsection (b) of this section may charge a disposal fee for the disposal of any abandoned manufactured home at a landfill pursuant to this Part.

An intact abandoned manufactured home shall not be disposed of in a landfill.

History.
2008-136, s. 1; 2013-409, s. 6.

§ 130A-309.114.
(Expires October 1, 2023) Process for the disposal of abandoned manufactured homes.

If a county adopts and implements a plan for the management of abandoned manufactured homes pursuant to this Part, the county shall notify the responsible party and the owner of the property on whose land the abandoned manufactured home is located for
each identified abandoned manufactured home in the county that the abandoned manufactured home must be properly disposed of by the responsible party within 90 days. The notice shall be in writing and shall be served on the person
as provided by Rule 4(j) of the Rules of Civil Procedure,

G.S. 1A-1

. The notice shall disclose the basis for the action and advise that a hearing will be held before a designated public officer at a place within the county in which the manufactured home is located not less than
10 days nor more than 30 days after the serving of the notice; that the responsible party shall be given the right to file an answer to the order and to appear in person, or otherwise, and give testimony at the place and time fixed
in the notice; and that the rules of evidence prevailing in courts of law or equity shall not be controlling in hearings before the public officer.

If, after notice and hearing, the public officer determines that the manufactured home under consideration is abandoned, the officer shall state in writing the officer’s findings of fact in support of that determination, and the county shall order the
responsible party to dispose of the abandoned manufactured home within 90 days of the expiration of this period. If the responsible party fails to comply with this order, the county shall take any action it deems reasonably necessary
to dispose of the abandoned manufactured home, including entering the property where the abandoned manufactured home is located and arranging to have the abandoned manufactured home deconstructed and disposed of in a manner consistent
with the plan developed under

G.S. 130A-309.113(a)

. If the responsible party is not the owner of the property on which the abandoned manufactured home is located, the county may order the property owner to permit entry onto the owner’s property by an appropriate
party to permit the removal and proper disposal of the abandoned manufactured home.

When a county removes, deconstructs, and disposes of an abandoned manufactured home pursuant to this section, whether directly or through a party that contracted with the county, the responsible party shall be liable for the actual costs incurred by the
county, directly or indirectly, for its abatement activities and its administrative and legal expenses incurred, less the amount of grants for reimbursement received by the county under

G.S. 130A-309.115

for the disposal activities for that manufactured home. The county may initiate a civil action to recover these unpaid costs from the responsible party. Nonpayment of any portion of the actual costs incurred by the
county shall result in the imposition of a lien on any real property in the county owned by the responsible party.

This section does not apply to any of the following:

A retail business premises where manufactured homes are sold.

A solid waste disposal facility where no more than 10 manufactured homes are stored at one time if all of the manufactured homes received for storage are deconstructed or removed from the facility within one year after receipt.

This section does not change the existing authority of a county or a municipality to enforce any existing laws or of any person to abate a nuisance.

History.
2008-136, s. 1.

§ 130A-309.115.
(Expires October 1, 2023) Grants to local governments.

The Department shall use funds from the Solid Waste Trust Fund established by

G.S. 130A-309.12

to:

Provide grants to counties to reimburse their expenses for activities under this Part.

Provide technical assistance and support to counties to achieve the purposes of this Part.

Implement this Part, including costs associated with staffing, training, submitting reports, and fulfilling program goals.

Each county that requests a reimbursement grant from the Department shall also submit to the Department a proposed budget specifying in detail the expenses it expects to incur in a specified time period in connection with the activities under this Part.
The Department shall review each submitted budget and make modifications, if necessary, in light of the availability of funds, the county’s capacity to effectively and efficiently manage the abatement of abandoned manufactured
homes, and any other factors that the Department reasonably determines are relevant. When the Department and a county agree on the amount of the county’s budget under this subsection, the Department and the county shall execute
an agreement that reflects this amount and that specifies the time period covered by the agreement, and the Department shall reserve funds for the county in the amount necessary to reimburse allowable costs. The amount of a reimbursement
grant shall be calculated in accordance with subsections (c) and (d) of this section. A county shall not receive a reimbursement grant unless it has filed all the annual reports it is required to submit under

G.S. 130A-309.117

.

Reimbursement grants shall be made in accordance with the terms of the grant agreement developed pursuant to subsection (b) of this section, but in any event, all reimbursements shall be calculated on a per-unit basis and based on the actual cost of such
activities, not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each unit. For a county designated as a development tier one or two area pursuant to

G.S. 143B-437.08

where the costs associated with the disposition of an abandoned manufactured home in a manner consistent with this Part exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) per unit, a county may request a supplemental grant in
an amount equal to fifty percent (50%) of the amount in excess of one thousand dollars ($1,000). The Department shall consider the efficiency and effectiveness of the county program in making the supplemental grant, and the county
participation must be a cash match.

A county shall use reimbursement grant funds only for operating expenses that are directly related to the management of abandoned manufactured homes. If an operating expense is partially related to the management of abandoned manufactured homes, a county
may use the reimbursement grant funds to finance the percentage of the cost that equals the percentage of the expense that is directly related to the management of abandoned manufactured homes.

History.
2008-136, s. 1.

§ 130A-309.116.
(Expires October 1, 2023) Authority to adopt ordinances.

A county, or a unit of local government that is delegated authority to do so by the county, may adopt ordinances it deems necessary in order to implement this Part.

History.
2008-136, s. 1.

§ 130A-309.117.
(Expires October 1, 2023) Reporting on the management of abandoned manufactured homes.

On or before 1 August of each year, any county that receives a reimbursement grant under

G.S. 130A-309.115

shall submit a report to the Department that includes all of the following information:

The number of units and approximate tonnage of abandoned manufactured homes removed, deconstructed, recycled, and disposed of during the previous fiscal year.

A detailed statement of the county’s abandoned manufactured homes account receipts and disbursements during the previous fiscal year that sets out the source of all receipts and the purpose of all disbursements.

The obligated and unobligated balances in the county’s abandoned manufactured homes account at the end of the fiscal year.

An assessment of the county’s progress in removing, deconstructing, recycling, and disposing of abandoned manufactured homes consistent with this Part.

The Department shall include in its annual report to the Environmental Review Commission under G.S. 130A-309.06(c) a description of the management of abandoned manufactured homes in the State for the fiscal year ending the preceding 30 June. The description
of the management of abandoned manufactured homes shall include all of the following information:

The cost to each county of managing its abandoned manufactured home program during the reporting period.

The beginning and ending balances of the Solid Waste Management Trust Fund for the reporting period and a list of grants made from the Fund for the period, itemized by county.

A summary of the information contained in the reports submitted by counties pursuant to subsection (a) of this section.

Any other information the Department considers helpful in understanding the problem of managing abandoned manufactured homes in the State.

History.
2008-136, s. 1.

§ 130A-309.118.
(Expires October 1, 2023) Effect on local ordinances.

This Part shall not be construed to limit the authority of counties under Article 18 of Chapter 153A of the General Statutes or the authority of cities under Article 19 of Chapter 160A of the General Statutes.

History.
2008-136, s. 1.

§ 130A-309.119.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

Part 2G. Plastic Bag Management.